Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202019-1839
Civil service commission; conduct of litigation; representation.

It shall be the duty of the commission to begin and conduct all civil suits which may be necessary for the proper enforcement of the Civil Service Act and of the rules of the commission. The commission may be represented in such suits and all investigations pursuant to the Civil Service Act by the city attorney or village attorney if authorized by the appointing authority. If the city attorney or village attorney does not represent the commission, the commission may be represented by special counsel appointed by it in any particular case.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 14, p. 136;

R.S.1943, § 19-1814;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1814;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 18;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 128.